src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-nagwl46_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - "nagõl, nakl": # Noun (46) "nagõl, nakl" 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     nagõl+N+Sg+Nom: [nagõl, nakl]
     nagõl+N+Sg+Gen: nagla
     nagõl+N+Sg+Par: nakla
     nagõl+N+Sg+Ill: nakla
     nagõl+N+Sg+Ine: [naglan, naglah, naglahn]
     nagõl+N+Sg+Ela: naglast
     nagõl+N+Sg+All: naglalõ
     nagõl+N+Sg+Ade: naglal
     nagõl+N+Sg+Abl: naglalt
     nagõl+N+Sg+Tra: naglas
     nagõl+N+Sg+Ter: naglaniq
     nagõl+N+Sg+Abe: naglaldaq
     nagõl+N+Sg+Com: naglagaq
     nagõl+N+Pl+Nom: naglaq
     nagõl+N+Pl+Gen: naklo
     nagõl+N+Pl+Par: naklo
     nagõl+N+Pl+Ill: [naklohe, naklo, naklodõ]
     nagõl+N+Pl+Ine: [naglon, nagloh, naglohn]
     nagõl+N+Pl+Ela: naglost
     nagõl+N+Pl+All: naglolõ
     nagõl+N+Pl+Ade: naglol
     nagõl+N+Pl+Abl: naglolt
     nagõl+N+Pl+Tra: naglos
     nagõl+N+Pl+Ter: nagloniq
     nagõl+N+Pl+Abe: nagloldaq
     nagõl+N+Pl+Com: naklogaq
